Washington statutes.
RCW 11.12.491

Electronic wills—Applicability.

RCW 11.12.400 through 11.12.490 apply to the electronic will of a decedent who dies on or after January 1, 2022.

[ 2021 c 140 s 1011.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 140 ss 1001-1016: See note following RCW 11.12.400.